Louisiana, session 2026, HB922.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IX of Chapter 9 of Title 45 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 45:1350.1 through 1350.3, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IX. ENERGY COSTS FROM DATA CENTERS
§1350.1. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, the following definitions have the following
meanings:
(1) "Commission" means the Public Service Commission.
(2) "Data center" means a facility or group of facilities used primarily for the
storage, processing, or distribution of digital data, including but not limited to
facilities supporting cloud computing, artificial intelligence training or inference,
cryptocurrency mining, or large-scale server operations, that impose new or
expanded electric demand of fifty megawatts or more.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1308 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 922
(3) "Household customer" means a residential electric customer of a
common carrier and public utility regulated by the commission.
(4) "New electric demand for data centers" means any incremental load,
infrastructure, generation, transmission, or distribution costs reasonably attributable
to serving or interconnecting a data center, including but not limited to new power
plants, transmission lines, substations, upgrades, or capacity additions approved or
placed in service.
§1350.2. Prohibition on utility rate increase
A.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no electric
public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the commission shall increase the price,
rate, or charge paid by any household customer as a direct or indirect result of new
electric demand for data centers.
(2) No electric public utility shall recover any costs attributable to new
electric demand for data centers from household customers.
B. The commission shall ensure that all costs associated with new electric
demand for data centers, including but not limited to generation, transmission,
distribution, fuel, operations and maintenance, depreciation, return on investment,
and any stranded costs, are allocated solely to the data center customer or customers
causing such demand through special contracts, tariffs, or rate classes that do not
permit any portion of such costs to be recovered from household customers.
§1350.3. Duties of the commission
A. The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement
cost-causation principles for data centers.
B. The rules outlined in Subsection A of this Section shall include all of the
following:
(1) Mandatory separate rate classes or special contracts for data centers that
ensure full cost recovery from the data center without cross-subsidization.
(2) Prohibition on any subsidy, explicit or implicit, from household or other
non-data-center customers.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1308 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 922
(3) Requirements for long-term contracts, a minimum fifteen years with data
centers that include provisions for full cost responsibility, including cost overruns,
decommissioning, and potential early termination or abandonment.
(4) Procedures for independent prudence reviews of utility investments
serving data centers.
C. The commission shall deny any rate adjustment, tariff change, or
certificate of public convenience and necessity that would result in household
customers bearing any portion of costs associated with new electric demand for data
centers.
Section 2. This Act shall apply only to any actions taken on or after the effective
date of this Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.